nursery/apertium-eng-afr/apertium-eng-afr.afr.dix
    <pardef n="h/ê__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/wees__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wees</l>
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>was</l>
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>synde</l>
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ontwikkel__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="uns"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="uns"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="uns"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="breek__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- this is a hack until it is fixed in transfer -->
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/baar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>baar</l>
          <r>baar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>baar</l>
          <r>baar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bore</l>
          <r>baar<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="k/an__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="s/al__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>al<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>al<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="moe/t__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>t<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="m/ag__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ag<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>ag<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="w/il__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>il<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="behoort__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="se__gen">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__gen"/></e>
    <e lm="hê"><par n="P__ge"/><i>h</i><par n="h/ê__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="wees"><par n="P__ge"/><i/><par n="/wees__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="druk"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>druk</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wyk"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>wyk</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klop"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>klop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hardloop"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>hardloop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vat"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>vat</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bring"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>bring</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="storm"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>storm</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skryf"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>skryf</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sit"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>sit</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="roep"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>roep</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nooi"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>nooi</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sterf"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>sterf</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pas"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>pas</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="koop"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>koop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lei"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>lei</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="voeg"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>voeg</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="loop"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>loop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><par n="P__ge"/><i>lig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="veg"><par n="P__ge"/><i>veg</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="loof"><par n="P__ge"/><i>loof</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gryp"><par n="P__ge"/><i>gryp</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vlug"><par n="P__ge"/><i>vlug</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leer"><i>leer</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="argifeer"><par n="P__ge"/><i>argifeer</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ry"><par n="P__ge"/><i>ry</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="baar"><par n="P__ge"/><i/><par n="/baar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drapeer"><par n="P__ge"/><i>drapeer</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="láát"><par n="P__ge"/><i>láát</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hoes"><par n="P__ge"/><i>hoes</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eindig"><par n="P__ge"/><i>eindig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="innig"><par n="P__ge"/><i>innig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="praat"><par n="P__ge"/><i>praat</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reis"><par n="P__ge"/><i>reis</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="waardeer"><i>waardeer</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kontak"><par n="P__ge"/><i>kontak</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ondersteun"><par n="P__ge"/><i>ondersteun</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="draai"><par n="P__ge"/><i>draai</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hoop"><par n="P__ge"/><i>hoop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="land"><par n="P__ge"/><i>land</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naam"><par n="P__ge"/><i>naam</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="publiseer"><par n="P__ge"/><i>publiseer</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sing"><par n="P__ge"/><i>sing</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slote"><par n="P__ge"/><i>slote</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stoor"><par n="P__ge"/><i>stoor</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vestig"><par n="P__ge"/><i>vestig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wond"><par n="P__ge"/><i>wond</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="strooi"><par n="P__ge"/><i>strooi</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afkondig"><par n="P__ge"/><i>afkondig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="geniet"><i>geniet</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kan"><i>k</i><par n="k/an__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="sal"><i>s</i><par n="s/al__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="moet"><i>moe</i><par n="moe/t__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="mag"><i>m</i><par n="m/ag__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="wil"><i>w</i><par n="w/il__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="behoort"><i>behoort</i><par n="behoort__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="verkoel"><i>verkoel</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verstaan"><i>verstaan</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verwelkom"><i>verwelkom</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verbrand"><i>verbrand</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verdien"><i>verdien</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verbaas"><i>verbaas</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verloor"><par n="P__ge"/><i>verloor</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vertaal"><par n="P__ge"/><i>vertaal</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verban"><i>verban</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verbruik"><i>verbruik</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vereer"><i>vereer</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vergesel"><i>vergesel</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verhef"><i>verhef</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verhoor"><i>verhoor</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verkort"><i>verkort</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verleng"><i>verleng</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verminder"><i>verminder</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="veronderstel"><i>veronderstel</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verraai"><i>verraai</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verset"><i>verset</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verskerp"><i>verskerp</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="versleg"><i>versleg</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="versteur"><i>versteur</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vertolk"><i>vertolk</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verwar"><i>verwar</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verwyder"><i>verwyder</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vergoed"><i>vergoed</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="betaal"><i>betaal</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beweeg"><i>beweeg</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bestaan uit">
      <i>bestaan</i>
      <par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/>
      <p>
        <l><b/>uit</l>
	<r><g><b/>uit</g></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e lm="bewater"><i>bewater</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="berou"><i>berou</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bedink"><i>bedink</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="belig"><i>belig</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beheer"><i>beheer</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="behou"><i>behou</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bereken"><i>bereken</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bevind"><i>bevind</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bevry"><i>bevry</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beland"><i>beland</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bestee"><i>bestee</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bestem"><i>bestem</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bespeur"><i>bespeur</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bedek"><i>bedek</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hou"><p><l>hou<b/>van</l><r>hou<g><b/>van</g></r></p><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="onthoof"><i>onthoof</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="onthul"><i>onthul</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ontruim"><i>ontruim</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ontvang"><i>ontvanger</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="herbevestig"><i>herbevestig</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="herleef"><i>herleef</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hervat"><i>hervat</i><par n="ontwikkel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="segregeer"><par n="P__ge"/><i>segregeer</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
